Illinois, session 104th, HB2356.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code is amended by changing Section 6-103.3 as 6follows: 7    (405 ILCS 5/6-103.3)8    Sec. 6-103.3. Clear and present danger; notice. If a 9person is determined to pose a clear and present danger to 10himself, herself, or to others by a physician, clinical 11psychologist, or qualified examiner, whether employed by the 12State, by any public or private mental health facility or part 13thereof, or by a law enforcement official or a school 14administrator, then the physician, clinical psychologist, or 15qualified examiner shall notify the Department of Human 16Services and a law enforcement official or school 17administrator shall notify the Illinois State Police and the 18appropriate local law enforcement agency, within 24 hours of 19making the determination that the person poses a clear and 20present danger. The Department of Human Services shall 21immediately update its records and information relating to 22mental health and developmental disabilities, and if 23appropriate, shall notify the Illinois State Police in a form   HB2356- 2 -LRB104 06151 KTG 16185 b1and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. 2Information disclosed under this Section shall remain 3privileged and confidential, and shall not be redisclosed, 4except as required under subsection (e) of Section 3.1 of the 5Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, nor used for any other 6purpose. The method of providing this information shall 7guarantee that the information is not released beyond that 8which is necessary for the purpose of this Section and shall be 9provided by rule by the Department of Human Services. The 10identity of the person reporting under this Section shall not 11be disclosed to the subject of the report. The physician, 12clinical psychologist, qualified examiner, law enforcement 13official, or school administrator making the determination and 14his or her employer shall not be held criminally, civilly, or 15professionally liable for making or not making the 16notification required under this Section, except for willful 17or wanton misconduct. This Section does not apply to a law 18enforcement official, if making the notification under this 19Section will interfere with an ongoing or pending criminal 20investigation.21    For the purposes of this Section:22        "Clear and present danger" has the meaning ascribed to 23    it in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification 24    Card Act.25        "Determined to pose a clear and present danger to 26    himself, herself, or to others by a physician, clinical   HB2356- 3 -LRB104 06151 KTG 16185 b1    psychologist, or qualified examiner" means in the 2    professional opinion of the physician, clinical 3    psychologist, or qualified examiner, a person poses a 4    clear and present danger. 5        "School administrator" means the person required to 6    report under the School Administrator Reporting of Mental 7    Health Clear and Present Danger Determinations Law.8(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)